New York, session 2025-2026, A5091.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. For the purposes of this act, the term "peaker plant elec- 2 tric generating facility" shall mean a major electric generating facili- 3 ty as defined in paragraph b of subdivision one of section 19-0312 of 4 the environmental conservation law that burns coal, oil, diesel or 5 natural gas and was operational and generated electricity less than 6 fifteen percent of the year during at least two years between two thou- 7 sand fourteen through two thousand twenty-four. 8 § 2. The public service commission, in conjunction with the New York 9 state energy research and development authority, is authorized and 10 directed to conduct a study of peaker plant electric generating facili- 11 ties on Long Island. Such study shall include, but not be limited to: 12 (a) the number of peaker plant electric generating facilities on Long 13 Island; 14 (b) the number of peaker plant electric generating facilities that are 15 necessary on Long Island; and 16 (c) how to reduce the number of peaker plant electric generating 17 facilities on Long Island. 18 § 3. The public service commission, in conjunction with the New York 19 state energy research and development authority, may conduct any hear- 20 ings or take any written testimony as it deems necessary in order to aid 21 such study, and shall take all other steps necessary to provide a thor- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08500-01-5 A. 5091 2 1 ough analysis of all issues related to the provisions listed in section 2 one of this act. 3 § 4. The public service commission, in conjunction with the New York 4 state energy research and development authority, shall issue its final 5 report no later than one year after the effective date of this act to 6 the governor, the speaker of the assembly, the temporary president of 7 the senate, and the chair of the assembly committee on energy and the 8 senate committee on energy and telecommunications, and post a copy of 9 such report on its website. 10 § 5. This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire and be 11 deemed repealed 2 years after such date.